src/morphology/affixes/verbs-L2.lexc
LEXICON BINDU_IV  !!= * __@CODE@__ as DIEVVA (but without short passive) for u-verbs with dim -astit, that are hardcoded
 +V+IV:%>Y7j SG3PASS ;
! +V+IV+Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-Spell:»Y7supmái K ;!L2
 +V+IV:%> BOAHTIINCH ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsBINDU ;


LEXICON BOAHTALADDA_IV  !!= * __@CODE@__ Already derived words (except words ending -uššat) - no actio as first part of compounds
 +V+IV:%> BOAHTALADDAStem ;
 +V+IV+PrfPrc+Err/Orth:Q1n K ;


LEXICON MAHTI_TV  !!= * __@CODE@__  Bisyllabic Verbs without Personal Passive but with Acc obj.
 +V+TV:%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsBOAHTI ;
! This lexicon goes as BOAHTI except for the TV tag.
! The reason is that máhtit takes acc objects, but does not have passive.

LEXICON MAHTALADDA_TV  !!= * __@CODE@__ Already derived words (except words ending -uššat)
 +V+TV:%> MAHTALADDAStem ;

LEXICON RAIMMAHALLA_IV      !!= * __@CODE@__ passives on -hallat and INCHOATIVES on -stuvvat
 +V+IV:%> RAIMMAHALLAINCH ;

LEXICON UVVA_IV      !!= * __@CODE@__ passives -uvvat
! +V+IV:uvva%> BOAHTIINCH ; no actor
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/goahti+V:uvva%>»goah'ti%> BOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +V+IV:uvva%> BOAHTICnj ;
 +V+IV+Inf+Err/Orth:uvvát K ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Err/Orth:uvva K ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der2+Der/las+A+Use/-Spell:uvva%>»X2lass LAS ; !L2
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct:uvva%>»m@C.NeedNoun@ BOAHTIN ;
! +V+IV+Der4+Der/muš+N+Use/-Spell:uvva%>»mušš@C.NeedNoun@ MUSH ; !L2
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/meahttun+Use/-Spell:uvva%>»W8meahttu MEAHTTUN ; !L2
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/ahtti+V+TV:»uhtti%> DIEHTIStem ;

 LEXICON SMUVVA_IV      !!= * __@CODE@__ passives -snuvvat, -snuvvat, -smit
 +v1+V+IV:muvva%> BOAHTIINCH ;
 +V+IV+Err/Orth:muvvá%> BOAHTIINCH ;
 +v2+V+IV+Use/NG:nuvva%> BOAHTIINCH ;
 +V+IV+Err/Orth:nuvvá%> BOAHTIINCH ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/ahtti+V+TV:»muhtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/ahtti+V+TV:»nuhtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +v3+Use/NG:m JORGGIID_IV ;


LEXICON DOAROSTUVVA_TV      !!= * __@CODE@__ INCHOATIVES on -stuvvat
 +V+TV:%> DIEHTIINCH ;


!LEXICON CIELGA_IV  Bisyllabic Verbs without Personal Passive and without Der/NomAg
!no words directed here at the moment
!+V+IV: SG3PASSV ;
!+V+IV+Der4+Der/goahti+V:»goah'ti%> BOAHTICnj ;
!+V+IV:%> BOAHTICnj ;
!+V+IV: DeverbalNounsDOHPPE- ;



!! !!Intermediate lexica for even-syllable verbs
!  - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -


LEXICON DIEHTIStem
 :Y7j PASSIVE ;
! +Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-Spell:»Y7supmái K ; !L2
 +Der1+Der/PassS+V+IV+Use/NG:»Y7  OT-PASSIVE ;
 DIEHTIINCH ;

LEXICON GILVIStem
 :Y7j PASSIVE ;
! +Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-Spell:»Y7supmái K ; !L2
 +Der1+Der/PassS+V+IV+Use/NG:»Y7  OT-PASSIVE_GILVI ;
 DIEHTIINCH ;

LEXICON ASTAStem
 :Y7j PASSIVE ;
! +Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-Spell:»Y7supmái K ;
 +Der1+Der/PassS+V+IV+Use/NG:»Y7  OT-PASSIVE ;
 ASTAINCH ;


LEXICON DIEHTALADDAStem
 :Y7j PASSIVE ;
! +Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-Spell:»Y7supmái K ; !not necessary here
 +Der1+Der/PassS+V+IV+Use/NG:»Y7  OT-PASSIVE ;
 DIEHTALADDAINCH ;

LEXICON MAHTALADDAStem
 :Y7j PASSIVE ;
! +Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-Spell:»Y7supmái K ; !not necessary here
 +Der1+Der/PassS+V+IV+Use/NG:»Y7  OT-PASSIVE ;
 MAHTALADDAINCH ;


LEXICON LAIGOHADDAStem
 :Y7j PASSIVE ;
! +Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-Spell:»Y7supmái K ; !not necessary here
 +Der1+Der/PassS+V+IV+Use/NG:»Y7  OT-PASSIVE ;
 LAIGOHADDAINCH ;


LEXICON DIEHTISHORTStem
 :Y7j PASSIVE ;
! +Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-Spell:»Y7supmái K ; !L2
 +Der1+Der/PassS+V+IV+Use/NG:»Y7  OT-PASSIVE ;
 DIEHTISHORTINCH ;

LEXICON DIEHTILONGSHORTStem
 :Y7j PASSIVE ;
! +Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-Spell:»Y7supmái K ; !L2
 +Der1+Der/PassS+V+IV+Use/NG:»Y7 OT-PASSIVE ;
 DIEHTILONGSHORTINCH ;

LEXICON BAHCCIStem
 :Y7j PASSIVE ;
! +Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-Spell:»Y7supmái K ; !L2
 +Der1+Der/PassS+V+IV+Use/NG:»Y7 OT-PASSIVE ;
BAHCCIINCH ;

LEXICON BOAHTIStem
 SG3PASSV ;
 BOAHTIINCH ;

 LEXICON BEALLJAStem
 SG3PASSV ;
 BEALLJAINCH ;


LEXICON BOAHTALADDAStem
 SG3PASSV ;
 BOAHTALADDAINCH ;

LEXICON BOAHTILONGSHORTStem
 SG3PASSV ;
 DIEHTILONGSHORTINCH ;

LEXICON DIEHTIINCH
 DeverbalNounsDIEHTI ;
 +Der4+Der/goahti+V:»goah'ti%> BOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 BOAHTICnj ;

LEXICON ASTAINCH
 +Der4+Der/goahti+V:»goah'ti%> BOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 BOAHTICnj ;


LEXICON BOAHTIINCH
 DeverbalNounsBOAHTI ;
 +Der4+Der/goahti+V:»goah'ti%> BOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 BOAHTICnj ;

LEXICON RAIMMAHALLAINCH
 DeverbalNounsRAIMMAHALLA ;
 +Der4+Der/goahti+V:»goah'ti%> BOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 BOAHTICnj ;


LEXICON BEALLJAINCH
 +Der4+Der/goahti+V:»goah'ti%> BOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 BOAHTICnj ;


LEXICON BOAHTALADDAINCH
 DeverbalNounsBOAHTALADDA ;
 +Der4+Der/goahti+V:»goah'ti%> BOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 BOAHTICnj ;

LEXICON DIEHTALADDAINCH
 DeverbalNounsDIEHTALADDA ;
 +Der4+Der/goahti+V:»goah'ti%> BOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 BOAHTICnj ;

LEXICON MAHTALADDAINCH
 +Der4+Der/goahti+V:»goah'ti%> BOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 BOAHTICnj ;


LEXICON LAIGOHADDAINCH
 +Der4+Der/goahti+V:»goah'ti%> BOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 BOAHTICnj ;


LEXICON DIEHTISHORTINCH
DeverbalNounsDIEHTISHORT ;
 +Der4+Der/goahti+V:»goah'ti%> BOAHTICnj ;
 BOAHTICnj ;

LEXICON DIEHTILONGSHORTINCH
DeverbalNounsDIEHTILONGSHORT ;
 +Der4+Der/goahti+V:»goah'ti%> BOAHTICnj ;
 BOAHTICnj ;

LEXICON BAHCCIINCH
DeverbalNounsBAHCCI ;
 +Der4+Der/goahti+V:»goah'ti%> BOAHTICnj ;
 BOAHTICnj ;


LEXICON BOAHTICnj
 +Ind+Prs: PrsV ;
 +Ind+Prt: PrtV ;
 +Pot+Prs:Q7ž PotC ;
 +Cond: CondV1 ;
 +Imprt: ImprtVA ;
 NominalFormsV ;


LEXICON CondV1
 +Prs+Err/Orth:Q6š CondBOAHTI ; ! goarošin
 +Prs+Err/Orth:Q4š CondBOAHTI ; !áiggušin
 +Prs:X6š CondBOAHTI ;         ! General -š- forms
 +Prs+Err/Orth:Q4l CondBOAHTI ;         ! !     -l- forms soappulin
 +Prs+Use/NG:X6l CondBOAHTI ;         !   ! -l- forms soppolin

LEXICON CondBOAHTI
 PrtC1 ;
 PrtC2 ;
 +ConNeg:e K ;

LEXICON ARVICnj
 +V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3:Q1 K ; ! Q1 because arvi is wrong
 +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%^DISIMPj K ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:Q6 K ;
 +V+IV+Cond+Prs+Sg3:X6šij K ;
 +V+IV+Cond+Prs+Sg3+Use/NG:X6lij K ;
 +V+IV+Cond+Prs+Sg3+Err/Orth:Q4lij K ;
 +V+IV+Cond+Prs+ConNeg:X6še K ;
 +V+IV+Cond+Prs+ConNeg+Use/NG:X6le K ;  ! ! X6 = i > á,
 +V+IV+Cond+Prs+ConNeg+Err/Orth:Q4le K ;  !   !Q4 i > á "Stem Vowel shift i:á"
 +V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3+Dial/%-GG:Q7ž K ;
 +V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3+Dial/%-KJ:Q7ža K ;
 +V+IV+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:Q7ž K ;
 +V+IV+Imprt+Sg3:Q3s ENDLEX ; !Prs
 +V+IV+PrfPrc:X2n K ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:X2n K ;
 +V+IV+Inf:t K ;
 +V+IV+Actio+Nom:n K ;
 +V+IV+Actio+Gen:n K ; ! ! (Re?)introducing?
 +V+IV+Actio+Ess:me K ;
 +V+IV+Actio+Ess:min K ;
 +V+IV+Actio+Ess:men K ;
 +V+IV+Actio+Loc:mis K ;
 +V+IV+Actio+Com:mijn K ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess+Use/NG:»min K ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess:»me K ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess:»men K ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom:»n R ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom:»n K ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Gen:»n K ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Gen:»ma K ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Acc:»ma K ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgGen:»ma R ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ill:»mij K ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc:»mis K ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com:»mijn K ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:»mijnna K ;
 +V+IV:X4 NominalFormsV7 ;
 +V+IV:Q6 NominalFormsV8 ;
 +V+IV:X6 NominalFormsV9 ;
 +V+IV: SG3PASSV ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/goahti+V:»goah'ti%> BOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
! Directly to this INCH, and not via the same path as the others, as arvi- does
! not get passive (& not deverbal nouns?). As a safety first -option, I do not add
! more than this one line now.




!! !!Basic lexica for contracted verbs
!  ---------------------------------
