src/morphology/stems/verbs-L2.lexc
LEXICON Verb
arvvuhuvvat:arvvuh UVVA_IV ;
ballat:balla MAHTI_TV ;
beahtahaddat:beahtahadda RAIMMAHALLA_IV ;
bealjehuvvat+Err/Sub:beallje7h UVVA_IV ;
beasadaddat:beasadadda BOAHTALADDA_IV ;
biepmahallat:biepmahalla RAIMMAHALLA_IV ;
bilttasmuvvat:bilttas SMUVVA_IV ;
bindut:bin'du BINDU_IV ;
boalohallat:boalohalla BOAHTALADDA_IV ;
borgohallat:borgohalla RAIMMAHALLA_IV ;
boršut:bor'šu BINDU_IV ;
buhtástuvvat:buhtást UVVA_IV ;
buolástaddat:buolástadda BOAHTALADDA_IV ;
buovvat:buovva MAHTI_TV ;
báhkasmuvvat:báhkas SMUVVA_IV ;
bátnálastit:bátnálas'ti BOAHTALADDA_IV ;
caddjohallat:caddjohalla RAIMMAHALLA_IV ;
cancut:can'cu BINDU_IV ;
cirgut:cir'gu BINDU_IV ;
ciskut:cis'ku BINDU_IV ;
deaivvahallat:deaivvahalla RAIMMAHALLA_IV ;
deaškašuvvat:deaškaš UVVA_IV ;
diehtit:dieh'ti MAHTI_TV ;
dielvvásmuvvat:dielvvás SMUVVA_IV ;
diktit:dik'ti MAHTI_TV ;
doarostuvvat:doaro7stuvva DOAROSTUVVA_TV ;
dolmmástallat:dolmmástalla BOAHTALADDA_IV ;
doškkohallat:doškkohalla RAIMMAHALLA_IV ;
duolmmastuvvat:duolmmastuvva DOAROSTUVVA_TV ;
duolmmostuvvat:duolmmo7stuvva DOAROSTUVVA_TV ;
duolmmástuvvat:duolmmást UVVA_IV ;
duvllohaddat:duvllohadda RAIMMAHALLA_IV ;
dáhtostuvvat:dáhto7stuvva DOAROSTUVVA_TV ;
dásáiduvvat:dásáid UVVA_IV ;
dásásmuvvat:dásás SMUVVA_IV ;
earánastit:earánas'ti BOAHTALADDA_IV ;
fidnestuvvat:fidnestuvva DOAROSTUVVA_TV ;
fuolastuvvat:fuolastuvva DOAROSTUVVA_TV ;
fámuiduvvat:fámuid UVVA_IV ;
fávrrosmuvvat:fávrros SMUVVA_IV ;
fáškut:fáš'ku BINDU_IV ;
garastallat:garastalla BOAHTALADDA_IV ;
geahkat:geah'ka MAHTI_TV ;
geaiddahallat:geaiddahalla RAIMMAHALLA_IV ;
gierddastuvvat:gierddastuvva DOAROSTUVVA_TV ;
gierásmuvvat:gierás SMUVVA_IV ;
giettáiduvvat:giettáid UVVA_IV ;
gillástuvvat:gil'lástuvva DOAROSTUVVA_TV ;
goargŋuladdat:goargŋuladda BOAHTALADDA_IV ;
goavásmuvvat:goavás SMUVVA_IV ;
golastuvvat:golastuvva RAIMMAHALLA_IV ;
gulastuvvat:gulastuvva DOAROSTUVVA_TV ;
guoggarastit:guoggaras'ti BOAHTALADDA_IV ;
gáskkahaddat:gáskkahadda RAIMMAHALLA_IV ;
gávastallat:gávastalla BOAHTALADDA_IV ;
gávnnastuvvat:gávnnastuvva DOAROSTUVVA_TV ;
heammástuvvat:heammást UVVA_IV ;
hejosmuvvat:hejos SMUVVA_IV ;
hilbbohallat:hilbbohalla BOAHTALADDA_IV ;
ijastaddat:ijastadda BOAHTALADDA_IV ;
ittásmuvvat:ittás SMUVVA_IV ;
jeagohuvvat:jeago7h UVVA_IV ;
jovssahallat:jovssahalla RAIMMAHALLA_IV ;
jugastuvvat:jugastuvva DOAROSTUVVA_TV ;
jáhkahaddat:jáhkahadda MAHTALADDA_TV ;
jáhkahallat:jáhkahalla MAHTALADDA_TV ;
jáhkestuvvat:jáhke7stuvva MAHTALADDA_TV ;
jáhkkit:jáhkki MAHTI_TV ;
keamppasmuvvat:keamppas SMUVVA_IV ;
liđgut:liđ'gu BINDU_IV ;
liškut:liš'ku BINDU_IV ;
loavttástuvvat:loavttást UVVA_IV ;
lumpehaddat:lumpehadda RAIMMAHALLA_IV ;
luoddanaddat:luoddanadda BOAHTALADDA_IV ;
luoittestuvvat:luoitte7stuvva DOAROSTUVVA_TV ;
luomusmuvvat:luomus SMUVVA_IV ;
molljut:mollju BINDU_IV ;
muoddáluvvat:muoddál UVVA_IV ;
máhttit:máhtti MAHTALADDA_TV ;
nirvut:nir'vu BINDU_IV ;
nirvvonárvvohallat:nirvvo#nárvvohalla BOAHTALADDA_IV ;
njalkkasmuvvat:njalkkas SMUVVA_IV ;
njamastuvvat:njamastuvva DOAROSTUVVA_TV ;
njeaiddáhaddat:njeaiddáhadda RAIMMAHALLA_IV ;
njivžut:njiv'žu BINDU_IV ;
noahkut:noah'ku MAHTI_TV ;
náitalstuvvat:náitalstuvva RAIMMAHALLA_IV ;
návccaiduvvat:návccaid UVVA_IV ;
oahpásmuvvat+Err/Sub:oahpas SMUVVA_IV ;
oaččostuvvat:oaččo7stuvva DOAROSTUVVA_TV ;
olbmástaddat:olbmástadda BOAHTALADDA_IV ;
ritnohallat:ritnohalla RAIMMAHALLA_IV ;
ruovttuiduvvat:ruovttuid UVVA_IV ;
ráhkásmuvvat:ráhkás SMUVVA_IV ;
ráđđádallat:ráđđádalla BOAHTALADDA_IV ;
skoldašuvvat:skoldaš UVVA_IV ;
skuldohaddat:skuldohadda RAIMMAHALLA_IV ;
smáđáhkásmuvvat:smáđáhkás SMUVVA_IV ;
sogŋostallat:sogŋostalla BOAHTALADDA_IV ;
stevdnehallat:stevdnehalla RAIMMAHALLA_IV ;
suivvastuvvat+Err/Sub:suivvást UVVA_IV ;
suvrrásmuvvat:suvrrás SMUVVA_IV ;
viccástallat:viccástalla BOAHTALADDA_IV ;
vuogehuvvat:vuoge7h UVVA_IV ;
vuonjasmuvvat:vuonjas SMUVVA_IV ;
vávjjáhallat:vávjjáhalla RAIMMAHALLA_IV ;
áddestuvvat:áddestuvva DOAROSTUVVA_TV ;
árvvasmuvvat:árvvas SMUVVA_IV ;
ávkašuvvat:ávkaš UVVA_IV ;
čavganaddat:čavganadda BOAHTALADDA_IV ;
šerosmuvvat:šeros SMUVVA_IV ;
šiehtastuvvat:šiehtastuvva DOAROSTUVVA_TV ;
čierostuvvat:čiero7stuvva DOAROSTUVVA_TV ;
čievččahallat:čievččahalla RAIMMAHALLA_IV ;
čuogastuvvat:čuogastuvva DOAROSTUVVA_TV ;
čuoimmástallat:čuoimmástalla BOAHTALADDA_IV ;
čálihuvvat:čálih UVVA_IV ;
čárvvohallat:čárvvohalla RAIMMAHALLA_IV ;
